Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2111
Renegotiation; when; extension; effect.

(1) A renegotiation shall be deemed to occur when an existing consumer rental purchase agreement is satisfied and replaced by a new agreement undertaken by the same consumer. A renegotiation shall be considered a new agreement requiring new disclosures. Renegotiation shall not include:

(a) The addition or return of property in a multiple-item agreement or the substitution of leased property if in either case the average payment allocable to a payment period is not changed by more than twenty-five percent;

(b) Deferral or extension of one or more periodic payments or portions of a periodic payment;

(c) A reduction in charges in the agreement;

(d) An agreement involving a court proceeding; and

(e) Any other event described in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

(2) No disclosures shall be required for any extension of a consumer rental purchase agreement.

Laws 1989, LB 681, § 11.